Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska47-305
City jails; construction; acquisition of lands; procedure; bonds.

The city council or legislative authority of such incorporated city is hereby authorized and empowered to erect and maintain a jail, and to acquire land by purchase, condemnation, or otherwise for farm or other purposes for the employment of prisoners. The procedure to condemn property shall be exercised in the manner set forth in sections 76-704 to 76-724. Such city shall have power to borrow money and pledge the credit and property thereof on its negotiable bonds or otherwise, for the purpose of paying for the cost of any such land, jail, or both.

Laws 1913, c. 228, § 5, p. 661;

R.S.1913, § 3547;

C.S.1922, § 3020;

C.S.1929, § 47-205;

R.S.1943, § 47-305;

Laws 1951, c. 101, § 99, p. 494;

Laws 1981, LB 140, § 2.